Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-230
Joint agreements; funds; revenue, use.

For the purpose of providing funds for necessary expenditures in carrying out the provisions of sections 3-221 to 3-232, a joint fund shall be created and maintained, into which each of the municipalities involved shall deposit its proportionate share as provided by the joint agreement. Such funds are to be provided by bond issues, tax levies and appropriations made by each municipality in the same manner as though it were acting separately under the authority of sections 3-201 to 3-238 and 18-1502. The revenue obtained from the ownership, control and operation of the airports and other air navigation facilities jointly controlled shall be paid into such fund, to be expended as provided in section 3-214. Revenue in excess of the cost of maintenance and operating expenses of the joint properties shall be divided as may be provided in the original agreement for the joint venture.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 11(10), p. 168.